Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4620.01
Existing rules, regulations, orders, suits, and proceedings; effect of transfer.

All rules, regulations, and orders of the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure or its predecessor agency adopted prior to May 1, 1998, in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the Public Service Commission under the Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles, shall continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.

No suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, lawfully commenced prior to May 1, 1998, or which could have been commenced prior to that date, by or against such department or agency, or the director or employee thereof in such director's or employee's official capacity or in relation to the discharge of his or her official duties, shall abate by reason of the transfer of duties and functions from such department or agency to the commission.

On and after May 1, 1998, unless otherwise specified, whenever any provision of law refers to such department or agency in connection with duties and functions transferred to the commission, the law shall be construed as referring to the commission.

Any costs incurred by the department and associated with the transfer of powers, duties, and functions to the commission under the code shall be borne by the commission.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 145.